Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1719.05
Collection of taxes, personal; distress warrant; forwarding to another county.

When the sheriff of the county in which a distress warrant has been issued is unable to serve the same because the taxpayer has moved from the county he shall, if the taxpayer is known to him to be actually residing in some other county in this state, forward such distress warrant to the sheriff of such county. Such sheriff shall serve and return it in the same manner in all respects as though it had originated in his county, except that the return thereof shall be made to the sheriff of the originating county on or before June 1 next following its issuance. The sheriff actually serving such warrant shall be allowed the fees and mileage allowed by section 77-1720.

Laws 1957, c. 335, § 1, p. 1172.